Utah statutes.
53B-16-305.   Applicability of the Government Records Access and Management
Act.
Except as otherwise provided by this part, the provisions of Title 63G,
Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, will apply to
restricted technology transfer or sponsored research records as defined in
this part, as if the records were protected records as defined by Title 63G,
Chapter 2.
